Maine, session 132, LD1768.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §4852, sub-§2, ¶A, as repealed and replaced by PL 1989, c.
48, §§5 and 31, is amended by amending subparagraph (5) to read:
(5) Pay the administrative costs of state public bodies or other public
instrumentalities and private, nonprofit corporations directly associated with
housing projects; and
Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA §4852, sub-§2, ¶A, as repealed and replaced by PL 1989, c.
48, §§5 and 31, is amended by enacting a new subparagraph (5-A) to read:
(5-A) Maintain housing affordability in mobile home parks to support ownership
of mobile home parks by mobile home owner's associations, resident-owned
housing cooperatives or other nonprofit entities representing the interests of mobile
home owners in mobile home parks; and
Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §4641-C, sub-§20, as amended by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. E, §3
and affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is further amended to read:
20. Controlling interests. Transfers of controlling interests in an entity with a fee
interest in real property if the transfer of the real property would qualify for exemption if
accomplished by deed of the real property between the parties to the transfer of the
controlling interest; and
Sec. 4. 36 MRSA §4641-C, sub-§21, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. E, §4 and
affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended to read:
21. Transfers pursuant to transfer on death deed. Any transfer of real property
effectuated by a transfer on death deed pursuant to Title 18‑C, Article 6, Part 4.; and
Sec. 5. 36 MRSA §4641-C, sub-§22 is enacted to read:
22. Certain deeds of mobile home park. Deeds conveying ownership of a mobile
home park from its owner to a majority of residents of the park at the time of conveyance
who are residents of the State or a mobile home owners' association of the mobile home
Page 1 - 132LR0894(03)

park organized in this State when the conveyance is made pursuant to Title 10, section
9094-A.
Sec. 6. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ADMINISTRATIVE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Revenue Services, Bureau of 0002
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for computer programming costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $53,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $53,000 $0
Page 2 - 132LR0894(03)